Hawaii statutes.
§269-7 Investigative powers. (a) The
public utilities commission and each commissioner shall have power to examine
into the condition of each public utility, the manner in which it is operated
with reference to the safety or accommodation of the public, the safety,
working hours, and wages of its employees, the fares and rates charged by it,
the value of its physical property, the issuance by it of stocks and bonds, and
the disposition of the proceeds thereof, the amount and disposition of its
income, and all its financial transactions, its business relations with other
persons, companies, or corporations, its compliance with all applicable state
and federal laws and with the provisions of its franchise, charter, and
articles of association, if any, its classifications, rules, regulations,
practices, and service, and all matters of every nature affecting the relations
and transactions between it and the public or persons or corporations.

(b) The commission may investigate any person
acting in the capacity of or engaging in the business of a public utility
within the State, without having a certificate of public convenience and
necessity or other authority previously obtained under and in compliance with
this chapter or the rules promulgated under this chapter.

(c) Any investigation may be made by the
commission on its own motion, and shall be made when requested by the public
utility to be investigated, or by any person upon a sworn written complaint to
the commission, setting forth any prima facie cause of complaint. A majority
of the commission shall constitute a quorum. [L 1913, c 89, §5; RL 1925, §2193;
RL 1935, §7945; RL 1945, §4706; RL 1955, §104-6; HRS §269-7; am L 1991, c 57,
§5]

Case Notes

Shipping from port to port in Territory is interstate
commerce. Commission has no jurisdiction to regulate rates and charges of
common carrier by water in interstate commerce for transportation of persons
and property from port to port. 24 H. 136.

Not repealed by Shipping Board Act (Sept. 7, 1916, 39 Stat.
451). 32 H. 127.

To establish rate basis, fix fair rate. 33 H. 487.

Interisland shipping. 33 H. 890, aff'd 96 F.2d 412, aff'd
305 U.S. 306.

Duty to require compliance with federal law. 47 H. 1, 384
P.2d 536.

PUC may dismiss complaint without a hearing or
investigation. 64 H. 289, 639 P.2d 1103.

The billing disputes would fall within the broad provisions
of §269-6 and this section, as a dispute between telecommunication carriers
regarding billing and compensation for services, but this would not deprive the
court of jurisdiction over the matters. The language of the statutes indicates
only that the public utilities commission (PUC) would have jurisdiction over
matters such as transactions between carriers, and not that the PUC would have exclusive
jurisdiction. 131 H. 257, 318 P.3d 97 (2013).

Cited: 665 F. Supp. 2d 1189 (2009).

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next